Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 5. Professional Teaching Practices Act.

Administrative Code. —

For professional teaching practices commission, see 20 AAC 10.

Sec. 14.20.370.
Teaching profession.

Teachers required by state law to be certificated, instructors in institutions of higher learning, school administrators, school program administrators, and school counselors are within the teaching profession.

History.

(§ 35 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For professional standards, see 20 AAC 10, art. 1.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Unless the duties of an employee of the department of education can be characterized as falling within one of the five categories of this section, that employee cannot be said to fall within the teaching profession for purposes of the Professional Teaching Practices Act. July 15, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

The only employees of the department of education who might fit into one of the categories of this section are those who are employed by the department at the Alaska Skill Center or in its centralized correspondence study program.
July 15, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.20.380.
Creation of a commission.

There is a commission of professional educators known as the Professional Teaching Practices Commission.

History.

(§ 35 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Sec. 14.20.390.
Appointment and qualifications.

The commission consists of nine members appointed by the governor and confirmed by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session.
Each member, in addition to having been actively engaged in the teaching profession for at least five years immediately preceding appointment, shall be a citizen of the United States and a resident of the state.

History.

(§ 35 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Sec. 14.20.400.
Composition of the commission.

The commission consists of the following members:

five classroom teachers;

one principal;

one superintendent;

one representative of the office of the commissioner;

one representative of an Alaska institution of higher learning.

History.

(§ 35 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Sec. 14.20.410.
Selection of members.

Members of the commission shall be selected as follows:

the five classroom teachers from lists of names submitted by recognized Alaska teachers’ organizations, each list not to exceed 12 names; however, in lieu of one of the five, one classroom teacher may be selected from a list of not more than four names signed and submitted by not less than 25 teachers who have no affiliation with any organization qualified to submit nomination lists, with the limitation that no teacher may sign more than one list in any year;

the principal from a list of three names submitted by the Alaska Principals Association;

the superintendent from a list of three names submitted by the Superintendents Advisory Commission;

the representative of the office of the commissioner from a list of three names submitted by the commissioner;

the representative of an Alaska institution of higher learning from lists of names submitted by Alaska institutions of higher learning, each list not to exceed three names.

The lists shall be submitted to the commissioner who shall submit them as a group to the governor’s office.

At least 30 days before a position on the commission is due to become vacant, the chairman shall cause notice of the impending vacancy to be published and to be conveyed to each organized group eligible to submit a list of nominees.

History.

(§ 35 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Sec. 14.20.420.
Term of office.

The term of office for each member of the commission is three years and, except as provided in AS

39.05.080

(4), each member serves until a successor is appointed.

Vacancies shall be filled by appointment by the governor and, except as provided in AS

39.05.080

(4), an appointment to fill a vacancy is for the unexpired term.

An individual may not serve more than a total of two 3-year terms.

The commission shall select a chairman from among its members.

History.

(§ 35 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 23 ch 14 SLA 1987; am §§ 5, 6 ch 80 SLA 1996)

Sec. 14.20.430.
Dismissal.

Any member may be removed by the governor for misconduct, malfeasance or nonfeasance in office, or incapacity.

History.

(§ 35 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Sec. 14.20.440.
Reimbursement.

Members of the commission shall receive per diem according to law and are to be granted administrative leave with full pay by their employer for time spent in the performance of official duties under AS

14.20.370

—

14.20.510

.
If a member is required to spend more than 15 days in a fiscal year in the performance of official duties under AS

14.20.370

—

14.20.510

, the state shall reimburse the employer for costs incurred after the 15th day.

History.

(§ 35 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 1975)

Sec. 14.20.450.
Responsibilities of commission.

The commission shall have the initial responsibility of developing, through the teaching profession, criteria of professional practices in areas including

ethical and professional performance;

preparation for and continuance in professional services; and

contractual obligations.

History.

(§ 35 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 15 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For professional standards, see 20 AAC 10, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, deleted “, but not limited to:” at the end of the introductory language.

Sec. 14.20.460.
Duties of commission.

The commission shall

establish procedures, and adopt regulations to implement the purposes of AS

14.20.370

—

14.20.510

;

conduct investigations and hearings on alleged violations of ethical or professional teaching performance, contractual obligations, and professional teaching misconduct;

review the regulations of the department as they relate to teacher certification and recommend necessary changes;

review the decisions of the department regarding the issuance or denial of certificates and in its discretion recommend reversal of decisions.

History.

(§ 35 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For professional standards, see 20 AAC 10, art. 1.

For complaints and investigations, see 20 AAC 10, art. 3.

Sec. 14.20.470.
Powers of commission.

The commission may

study proposals developed by regular committees of any existing professional organization whose members are within the teaching profession;

subpoena witnesses, place them under oath, and maintain written records;

warn or reprimand members of the teaching profession, if in the judgment of the commission such action is warranted;

suspend or revoke the certificate of a member of the teaching profession for one of the reasons set out in AS

14.20.030

except that in the case of an administrator, the commissioner must concur;

make any recommendation to the board or to school boards that will promote an improvement in the teaching profession;

request assistance through any of the investigative processes of any existing professional teaching organizations when analyzing charges of breach of ethical or professional teaching practices;

appoint an executive secretary, delegate those ministerial functions to the executive secretary as the commission may decide and set the executive secretary’s compensation with a starting salary not exceeding range 26, step B of the pay plan for state employees in AS

39.27.011(a)

.

A decision issued by the commission with the approval of the commissioner under (a)(4) of this section is final.

History.

(§ 35 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 77 SLA 1972; am §§ 3, 4 ch 9 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 103 SLA 1976; am § 13 ch 94 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For professional standards, see 20 AAC 10, art. 1.

For complaints and investigations, see 20 AAC 10, art. 3.

Collateral references. —

Bias of members of license revocation board. 97 ALR2d 1210.

Sec. 14.20.475.
Applicability of the Administrative Procedure Act.

AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to regulations and proceedings under AS

14.20.370

—

14.20.510

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 9 SLA 1975)

Sec. 14.20.480.
Effect of standards.

Members of the teaching profession are obligated to abide by the professional teaching standards adopted by the commission.

History.

(§ 35 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For professional standards, see 20 AAC 10, art. 1.

Sec. 14.20.500.
Support.

In addition to available state funds, the commission shall also be financed by members of the profession in accordance with regulations adopted by the department including, if necessary, an increase in the fees for certificates.

History.

(§ 35 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 73 SLA 1973)

Sec. 14.20.510.
Short title.

AS

14.20.370

—

14.20.510

shall be known as the Professional Teaching Practices Act.

History.

(§ 35 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Secs. 14.20.550 — 14.20.610.
Negotiation and mediation. [Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SLA 1992. For current provisions on teacher negotiations, see AS 23.40.]